Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2938HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 934 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY ââ DRUG INTERDICTION 1 PROGRAM ââ APPROPRIATION. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 3 state to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For the creation of a drug interdiction program in 8 conjunction with the Iowa national guard within the department 9 of public safety pursuant to this section for salaries, 10 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not 11 more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,200,000 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 12.00 14 2. The department of public safety shall partner with the 15 Iowa national guard to create a drug interdiction program to 16 combat the trafficking of illicit drugs within the state. 17 3. The department shall employ up to 10.00 full-time drug 18 interdiction specialists and 2.00 full-time criminal analysts 19 as part of the drug interdiction program. 20 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 21 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 22 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 23 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 24 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25